Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. ASSISTED COMMUNITY TREATMENT

Note

The part heading was amended by L 2013, c 221, §2, subject to
repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.

Cross References

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

§334-121 Criteria for assisted community
treatment. [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.]
A person may be ordered to obtain assisted community treatment if the family
court finds that:

(1) The person is mentally ill or suffering from
substance abuse; and

(2) The person is unlikely to live safely in the
community without available supervision based on the professional opinion of a
psychiatrist; and

(3) The person, at some time in the past: (A) has
received inpatient hospital treatment for mental illness or substance abuse or
(B) has been found to be imminently dangerous to self or others, as a result of
mental illness or substance abuse; and

(4) The person, based on the person's treatment
history and current condition, is now in need of treatment in order to prevent
a relapse or deterioration which would predictably result in the person
becoming imminently dangerous to self or others; and

(5) The person has a history of a lack of adherence
to treatment for mental illness or substance abuse, and the person's current
mental status or the nature of the person's disorder limits or negates the
person's ability to make an informed decision to voluntarily seek or comply
with recommended treatment; and

(6) The assisted community treatment is medically
appropriate, and in the person's medical interests; and

(7) Considering less intrusive alternatives, assisted
community treatment is essential to prevent the danger posed by the person. [L
1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 138, §2; am L 2013, c 221, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next